ja: フラットウェア素材: バンブー; ブナ材; セラミック; ガラス; ゴールド; 金メッキ; メラミン; ナイロン; プラスチック; ポリエチレン (PE); ポリプロピレン (PP); ポリ塩化ビニル (PVC); 磁器; シリコーン; シルバー; 銀メッキ; ステンレススチール; スチール; 合成品; 熱可塑性エラストマー (TPE); 熱可塑性ポリウレタン (TPU); 木材; その他
lt-LT: Stalo įrankių medžiaga: Bambukas; Buko mediena; Keramika; Stiklas; Auksas; Paauksuotas; Melaminas; Nailonas; Plastikas; Polietilenas (PE); Polipropilenas (PP); Polivinilchloridas (PVC); Porcelianas; Silikonas; Sidabrinė; Pasidabruotas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Plienas; Sintetika; Termoplastinis elastomeras (TPE); Termoplastinis poliuretanas (TPU); Mediena; Kita
es: Material de la cubertería: Bambú; Madera de haya; Cerámica; Vidrio; Dorado; Chapado en oro; Melamina; Nylon; Plástico; Polietileno (PE); Polipropileno (PP); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Porcelana; Silicona; Plateado; Plateado; Acero inoxidable; Acero; Sintético; Elastómero termoplástico (TPE); Poliuretano termoplástico (TPU); Madera; Otros
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำชุดช้อนส้อมมีด: ไผ่; ไม้บีช; เซรามิก; แก้ว; โกลด์; ชุบทอง; เมลามีน; ไนลอน; พลาสติก; โพลิเอทิลีน (PE); โพลิโพรพิลีน (PP); โพลิไวนิลคลอไรด์ (PVC); พอร์ซเลน; ซิลิโคน; ซิลเวอร์; ชุบเงิน; เหล็กสเตนเลส; เหล็ก; สังเคราะห์; เทอร์โมพลาสติกเอลาสโตเมอร์ (TPE); เทอร์โมพลาสติกโพลิยูรีเทน (TPU); ไม้; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Material dos talheres: Bambu; Madeira de faia; Cerâmica; Vidro; Ouro; Banhado a ouro; Melamina; Náilon; Plástico; Polietileno (PE); Polipropileno (PP); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Porcelana; Silicone; Prata; Banhado a prata; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Sintético; Elastómero termoplástico (TPE); Poliuretano termoplástico (TPU); Madeira; Outro
bg-BG: Материал за прибори за хранене: Бамбук; Букова дървесина; Керамика; Стъкло; Злато; Позлатено покритие; Меламин; Найлон; Пластмаса; Полиетилен (PE); Полипропилен (PP); Поливинилхлорид (PVC); Порцелан; Силикон; Сребро; Посребрено покритие; Неръждаема стомана; Стомана; Синтетичен; Термопластичен еластомер (TPE); Термопластичен полиуретан (TPU); Дърво; Други
vi: Vật liệu đồ dẹt để bàn ăn: Tre; Gỗ dẻ; Gốm; Thủy tinh; Vàng; Mạ vàng; Melamine; Nylon; Nhựa; Polyethylene (PE); Polypropylene (PP); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Sứ; Silicon; Trắng; Mạ bạc; Thép không gỉ; Thép; Tổng hợp; Elastomer nhiệt dẻo (TPE); Polyurethane nhiệt dẻo (TPU); Gỗ; Khác
fi: Astiamateriaali: Bambu; Pyökkipuu; Keraaminen; Lasi; Kulta; Kullattu; Melamiini; Nailon; Muovi; Polyeteeni (PE); Polypropeeni (PP); Polyvinyylikloridi (PVC); Posliini; Silikoni; Hopea; Hopeoitu; Ruostumaton teräs; Teräs; Synteettinen; Termoplastinen elastomeeri (TPE); Termoplastinen polyuretaani (TPU); Puu; Muu
cs: Materiál příborů: Bambus; Bukové dřevo; Keramika; Sklo; Zlatá; Pozlacené; Melamin; Nylon; Plast; Polyethylen (PE); Polypropylen (PP); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Porcelán; Silikon; Stříbrná; Postříbřený; Nerezová ocel; Ocel; Syntetické; Termoplastický elastomer (TPE); Termoplastický polyuretan (TPU); Dřevo; Jiné
sl-SI: Material jedilnega pribora: Bambus; Bukov les; Keramika; Stekleni; Zlato; Pozlačeno; Melamin; Najlon; Plastika; Polietilen (PE); Polipropilen (PP); Polivinilklorid (PVC); Porcelan; Silikon; Srebro; Posrebreno; Nerjavno jeklo; Jeklo; Sintetika; Termoplastični elastomer (TPE); Termoplastični poliuretan (TPU); Les; Drugo
hu: Evőeszközök anyaga: Bambusz; Bükkfa; Kerámia; Üveg; Arany; Aranyozott; Melamin; Nejlon; Műanyag; Polietilén (PE); Polipropilén (PP); Polivinil-klorid (PVC); Porcelán; Szilikon; Ezüst; Ezüstözött; Rozsdamentes acél; Acél; Szintetikus; Hőre lágyuló elasztomer (TPE); Hőre lágyuló poliuretán (TPU); Fa; Egyéb
nl: Materiaal bestek: Bamboe; Beukenhout; Keramiek; Glas; Gold; Verguld; Melamine; Nylon; Plastic; Polyethyleen (PE); Polypropyleen (PP); Polyvinylchloride (PVC); Porselein; Siliconen; Silver; Verzilverd; Roestvrij staal; Staal; Synthetisch; Thermoplastisch elastomeer (TPE); Thermoplastisch polyurethaan (TPU); Hout; Andere
el: Είδη που περιλαμβάνονται σε ένα σερβίτσιο: Μπαμπού; Ξύλο οξυάς; Κεραμικό; Γυαλί; Χρυσό; Επίχρυσο; Μελαμίνη; Νάιλον; Πλαστικό; Πολυαιθυλένιο (PE); Πολυπροπυλένιο (PP); Πολυβινυλοχλωρίδιο (PVC); Πορσελάνη; Σιλικόνη; Ασήμι; Επάργυρο; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Χάλυβας; Συνθετικό; Θερμοπλαστικό ελαστομερές (TPE); Θερμοπλαστική πολυουρεθάνη (TPU); Ξύλο; Άλλο
ko: 플랫웨어 소재: 대나무; 너도밤나무; 세라믹; 유리; 금색; 금 도금; 멜라민; 나일론; 플라스틱; 폴리에틸렌(PE); 폴리프로필렌(PP); 폴리염화비닐(PVC); 도기; 실리콘; 은색; 은 도금; 스테인리스 스틸; 강철; 인조; 열가소성 엘라스토머(TPE); 열가소성 폴리우레탄(TPU); 목재; 기타
ro-RO: Material tacâmuri: Bamboo; Lemn de fag; Ceramic; Sticlă; Auriu; Placat cu aur; Melamină; Nailon; Plastic; Polietilenă (PE); Polipropilenă (PP); Clorură de polivinil (PVC); Porțelan; Silicon; Argint; Placat cu argint; Oțel inoxidabil; Oțel; Sintetic; Elastomer termoplastic (TPE); Poliuretan termoplastic (TPU); Lemn; Altele
pl: Materiał sztućców: Bambus; Drewno bukowe; Ceramika; Szkło; Złota; Pozłacany; Melamina; Nylon; Tworzywo sztuczne; Polietylen (PE); Polipropylen (PP); Polichlorek winylu (PVC); Porcelana; Silikon; Srebrna; Posrebrzany; Stal nierdzewna; Stal; Syntetyczne; Elastomer termoplastyczny (TPE); Poliuretan termoplastyczny (TPU); Drewno; Pozostałe
fr: Matériau des couverts: Bambou; Bois de hêtre; Céramique; Verre; Or; Plaqué or; Mélamine; Nylon; Plastique; Polyéthylène (PE); Polypropylène (PP); Chlorure de polyvinyle (PVC); Porcelaine; Silicone; Argent; Plaqué argent; Acier inoxydable; Acier; Synthétique; Élastomère thermoplastique (TPE); Polyuréthane thermoplastique (TPU); Bois; Autre
zh-CN: 扁平餐具材质: 竹子; 山毛榉木; 陶瓷制品; 玻璃; 金色; 镀金; 三聚氰胺; 尼龙; 塑料; 聚乙烯 (PE); 聚丙烯 (PP); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 瓷器; 硅胶; 银色; 镀银; 不锈钢; 钢; 合成; 热塑性弹性体 (TPE); 热塑性聚氨酯 (TPU); 木头; 其他
de: Besteckmaterial: Bambus; Buchenholz; Keramik; Glas; Gold; Vergoldet; Melamin; Nylon; Kunststoff; Polyethylen (PE); Polypropylen (PP); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Porzellan; Silikon; Silber; Versilbert; Edelstahl; Stahl; Synthetisch; Thermoplastisches Elastomer (TPE); Thermoplastisches Polyurethan (TPU); Holz; Sonstiges
sv: Matbestick - material: Bambu; Bokträ; Keramisk; Glas; Gyllene; Guldpläterad; Melamin; Nylon; Plast; Polyeten (PE); Polypropen (PP); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Porslin; Silikon; Silver; Silverpläterad; Rostfritt stål; Stål; Syntetisk; Termoplastisk elastomer (TPE); Termoplastisk polyuretan (TPU); Trä; Annat
tr: Sofra takımı malzemesi: Bambu; Kayın ağacı; Seramik; Cam; Gold; Altın kaplama; Melamin; Plastik; Plastik; Polietilen (PE); Polipropilen (PP); Polivinil klorür (PVC); Porselen; Silikon; Silver; Gümüş kaplama; Paslanmaz çelik; Çelik; Sentetik; Termoplastik elastomer (TPE); Termoplastik poliüretan (TPU); Ahşap; Diğer
en: Flatware material: Bamboo; Beech wood; Ceramic; Glass; Gold; Gold-plated; Melamine; Nylon; Plastic; Polyethylene (PE); Polypropylene (PP); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Porcelain; Silicone; Silver; Silver-plated; Stainless steel; Steel; Synthetic; Thermoplastic elastomer (TPE); Thermoplastic polyurethane (TPU); Wood; Other
zh-TW: 飲具材質: 竹子; 山毛櫸木; 陶瓷; 玻璃; 金色; 鍍金; 三聚氰胺; 尼龍; 塑膠; 聚乙烯 (PE); 聚丙烯 (PP); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 陶瓷; 矽膠; 銀色; 鍍銀; 不銹鋼; 鋼; 合成; 熱塑性彈性體 (TPE); 熱塑性聚氨酯 (TPU); 木材; 其他
ru: Материал столовых приборов: Бамбук; Бук; Керамика; Стеклянные; Золото; Позолота; Меламин; Нейлон; Пластик; Полиэтилен (ПЭ); Полипропилен (ПП); Поливинилхлорид (ПВХ); Фарфор; Силикон; Серебро; Серебрение; Нержавеющая сталь; Сталь; Синтетика; Термопластичный эластомер (ТПЭ); Термопластичный полиуретан (ТПУ); Дерево; Другой
it: Materiale delle posate: Bamboo; Legno di faggio; Ceramica; Vetro; Oro; Placcato oro; Melammina; Nylon; Plastica; Polietilene (PE); Polipropilene (PP); Cloruro di polivinile (PVC); Porcellana; Silicone; Argento; Placcato argento; Acciaio inossidabile; Acciaio; Sintetico; Elastomero termoplastico (TPE); Poliuretano termoplastico (TPU); Legno; Altro
da: Spisebestiksmateriale: Bambus; Bøgetræ; Keramik; Glas; Guld; Forgyldt; Melamin; Nylon; Plast; Polyethylen (PE); Polypropylen (PP); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Porcelæn; Silikone; Sølv; Forsølvet; Rustfrit stål; Stål; Syntetisk; Termoplastisk elastomer (TPE); Termoplastisk polyurethan (TPU); Træ; Andet
nb: Bestikkmateriale: Bambus; Bøktre; Keramikk; Glass; Gull; Gullbelagt; Melamin; Nylon; Plast; Polyetylen (PE); Polypropylen (PP); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Porselen; Silikon; Sølv; Sølvforgylt; Rustfritt stål; Stål; Syntetisk; Termoplastisk elastomer (TPE); Termoplastisk polyuretan (TPU); Trevirke; Annen
hr-HR: Materijal pribora za jelo: Bambus; Bukovina; Keramika; Staklo; Zlato; Pozlaćeno; Melamin; Najlon; Plastika; Polietilen (PE); Polipropilen (PP); Polivinil klorid (PVC); Porculan; Silikon; Srebro; Posrebreno; Nehrđajući čelik; Čelik; Sintetika; Termoplastični elastomer (TPE); Termoplastični poliuretan (TPU); Drvo; Ostalo
sk-SK: Materiál príborov: Bambus; Bukové drevo; Keramika; Sklo; Zlato; Pozlátený; Melamín; Nylon; Plast; Polyetylén (PE); Polypropylén (PP); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Porcelán; Silikón; Strieborný; Postriebrený; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Oceľ; Syntetický; Termoplastický elastomér (TPE); Termoplastický polyuretán (TPU); Drevo; Iné
pt-BR: Material de talheres: Bambu; Madeira de faia; Cerâmica; Vidro; Gold; Banhado a ouro; Melamina; Nylon; Plástico; Polietileno (PE); Polipropileno (PP); Cloreto de polivinila (PVC); Porcelana; Silicone; Silver; Banhado a prata; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Sintético; Elastômero termoplástico (TPE); Poliuretano termoplástico (TPU); Madeira; Outro